Vermont, session 2025-2026, H122.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Governance Structures * * *
Sec. 1. GOVERNANCE STRUCTURES; POLICY
In order to provide substantially equal educational opportunities in an
efficient, sustainable, and stable education system that enables students to
achieve or exceed the State’s Education Quality Standards, while also
maximizing operational efficiencies, the State shall provide for the education
of its students across not more than 25 separate school districts.
Sec. 2. SUSTAINABLE GOVERNANCE STRUCTURES
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before July
1, 2030, the State shall provide educational opportunities through the merger of
the school districts in existence on July 1, 2025 into not more than 25 newly
formed unified union school districts. Each of the newly formed school
districts shall:
(1) be responsible for the education of its resident prekindergarten
through grade 12 students;
(2) be its own supervisory district; and
(3) be organized and operate schools for all grades, prekindergarten
through grade 12, subject to the following provisions:
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 3 of 32
(A) A school district may choose to designate, pursuant to 16 V.S.A.
§§ 820 and 827, not more than three schools that are eligible for designation to
provide education for resident students of the district who would spend:
(i) more than 45 minutes being transported from the resident’s
home to a public elementary school located within the district; or
(ii) more than 75 minutes being transported from the resident’s
home to a public high school located within the district.
(B) An elementary school operated by a school district shall have a
minimum:
(i) average daily membership of 450 students; and
(ii) average class size of 18 students.
(C) A high school operated by a school district shall have a
minimum:
(i) average daily membership of 600 students; and
(ii) average class size of 25 students.
(D) The provisions of this subdivision (3) regarding minimum
average daily membership and average class sizes shall not apply to a public
school, public school program, or a therapeutic school, if all students in the
school or program are enrolled in the class or school either as a documented
part of the student’s IEP or Section 504 plan or pursuant to a written agreement
between the local education agency and the school, as applicable.
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 4 of 32
(b) School districts that meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section shall be formed by merging the governance structures of all member
districts into a single unified union school district pursuant to the processes and
requirements of 16 V.S.A. chapter 11. Newly formed school districts shall
obtain an affirmative vote of all “necessary” districts not later than July 1,
2029 and shall be operational on or before July 1, 2030. The study committee
report presented to the State Board and district voters pursuant to 16 V.S.A.
chapter 11 shall indicate how the proposed unified union school district will
meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
(c) In addition to making the findings required under 16 V.S.A. § 709 and
considering whether the proposed unified union school district will meet the
requirements of subsection (a) of this section, when evaluating the study
committee report, the State Board shall also be mindful of any other district in
the region that may become geographically isolated. The State Board may
request the Secretary of Education to work with potentially isolated districts
and other districts in the region to move toward a governance structure that
meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
(d) The State Board is authorized to deny approval to a proposal that would
geographically isolate a district that would not be an appropriate member of
another sustainable governance structure in the region.
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 5 of 32
(e) The State Board may adjust the boundaries and existence of supervisory
unions as necessary based on the newly formed unified union school districts
created pursuant to this section.
Sec. 3. REVIEW OF SUSTAINABLE GOVERNANCE STRUCTURES
(a) Secretary’s recommendation. In order to ensure the State is able to
provide educational opportunities through the merger of the school districts in
existence on July 1, 2025 into not more than 25 newly formed unified union
school districts that meet the requirements of Sec. 1 of this act, the Secretary of
Education shall review the governance structures of the school districts and
supervisory unions of the State as they will exist, or are anticipated to exist, on
July 1, 2030. On or before June 1, 2029, the Secretary shall develop, publish
on the Agency of Education’s website, and present to the Commission on the
Sustainable Realignment of Vermont School Districts a proposed plan that, to
the extent necessary to align the provision of education with the requirements
of Sec. 1 of this act, would move districts then in existence into larger unified
union school districts.
(b) Final plan. On or before November 30, 2029, the Commission on the
Sustainable Realignment of Vermont School Districts shall review and analyze
the Secretary’s proposal, may take testimony or ask for additional information
from districts and supervisory unions, shall approve the Secretary’s proposal
either in its original form or in an amended form that complies with Sec. 1 of
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 6 of 32
this act, and shall publish on the Agency’s website its order merging and
realigning districts and supervisory unions where necessary.
(c) Applicability. This section shall not apply to:
(1) an interstate school district; or
(2) a regional career technical center school district formed under 16
V.S.A. chapter 37, subchapter 5A.
(d) Charters. The provisions of this section shall supersede any educational
charter provision to the contrary.
(e) Creation of the Commission on the Sustainable Realignment of
Vermont School Districts.
(1) Creation. There is created the Commission on the Sustainable
Realignment of Vermont School Districts to review and analyze the Secretary
of Education’s proposal pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and issue an
order merging and realigning districts and supervisory unions where necessary
to ensure all Vermont school districts comply with the requirements of Sec. 1
of this act.
(2) Membership. The Commission shall be composed of five retired
superintendents:
(A) one member shall be appointed by the Governor;
(B) two members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House;
and
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 7 of 32
(C) two members shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on
Committees.
(3) Powers and duties. The Commission shall review and analyze the
Secretary of Education’s proposal pursuant to this section and issue an order
merging and realigning districts and supervisory unions where necessary to
ensure all Vermont school districts comply with the requirements of Sec. 1 of
this act.
(4) Assistance. The Commission shall have the administrative,
technical, and legal assistance of the Agency of Education.
(5) Final plan. On or before November 30, 2029, the Commission on
the Sustainable Realignment of Vermont School Districts shall issue its final
plan in accordance with the requirements of subsection (b) of this section.
(6) Meetings.
(A) The member appointed by the Governor shall call the first
meeting of the Commission to occur after the Secretary’s plan is issued
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, but not later than July 1, 2029.
(B) The Commission shall select a chair from among its members at
the first meeting.
(C) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(D) The Commission shall cease to exist on July 1, 2031.
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 8 of 32
(7) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Commission
shall be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as
permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than 10 meetings. These
payments shall be made from monies appropriated to Agency of Education.
* * * Independent Schools * * *
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 11 is amended to read:
§ 11. CLASSIFICATIONS AND DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this title, unless the context otherwise clearly requires:
* * *
(8) “Independent school” means a school other than a public school,
which provides a program of elementary or secondary education, or both. An
“independent school meeting education quality standards” means an
independent school in Vermont that undergoes the education quality standards
process and meets the requirements of subsection 165(b) of this title.
* * *
(19) “Recognized independent school” for any school year means an
independent school that meets the requirements for recognized independent
schools in section 166 of this title and that is not a home study program.
(20) “Approved independent school” means an independent school that
is approved under section 166 of this title. [Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 9 of 32
(36) “Therapeutic school” means a recognized independent school that
limits enrollment to students who are on an individualized education program
(IEP) or plan under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C.
§ 794 and who are enrolled pursuant to a written contract between a local
education agency (LEA) and the school.
* * *
Sec. 5. 16 V.S.A. § 166 is amended to read:
§ 166. APPROVED AND RECOGNIZED INDEPENDENT SCHOOLS
(a) Authority. An independent school may operate and provide elementary
education or secondary education if it is either approved or recognized as set
forth in this section.
(b) Approved independent schools. On application, the State Board shall
approve an independent school that offers elementary or secondary education
if it finds, after opportunity for hearing, that the school provides a minimum
course of study pursuant to section 906 of this title and that it substantially
complies with all statutory requirements for approved independent schools and
the Board’s rules for approved independent schools. An independent school
that intends to accept public tuition shall be approved by the State Board only
on the condition that the school agrees, notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, to enroll any student who requires special education services
and who is placed in or referred to the approved independent school as an
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 10 of 32
appropriate placement and least restrictive environment for the student by the
student’s individualized education program team or by the local education
agency; provided, however, that this requirement shall not apply to an
independent school that limits enrollment to students who are on an
individualized education program or a plan under Section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, and who are enrolled pursuant to
a written agreement between the local education agency and the school.
Except as provided in subdivision (6) of this subsection, the Board’s rules must
at minimum require that the school have the resources required to meet its
stated objectives, including financial capacity, faculty who are qualified by
training and experience in the areas in which they are assigned, and physical
facilities and special services that are in accordance with any State or federal
law or regulation. Approval may be granted without State Board evaluation in
the case of any school accredited by a private, State, or regional agency
recognized by the State Board for accrediting purposes, provided that the State
Board shall determine that the school complies with all student enrollment
provisions required by law.
(1) On application, the State Board shall approve an independent school
that offers kindergarten but no other graded education if it finds, after
opportunity for hearing, that the school substantially complies with the Board’s
rules for approved independent kindergartens. The State Board may delegate
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 11 of 32
to another State agency the authority to evaluate the safety and adequacy of the
buildings in which kindergartens are conducted but shall consider all findings
and recommendations of any such agency in making its approval decision.
(2) Approvals under this subsection (b) shall be for a term established
by rule of the Board but not greater than five years.
(3) An approved independent school shall provide to the parent or
guardian responsible for each of its students, prior to accepting any money for
a student, an accurate statement in writing of its status under this section and a
copy of this section. Failure to comply with this provision may create a
permissible inference of false advertising in violation of 13 V.S.A. § 2005.
(4) Each approved independent school shall provide to the Secretary on
October 1 of each year the names, genders, dates of birth, and addresses of its
enrolled students. Within seven days of the termination of a student’s
enrollment, the approved independent school shall notify the Secretary of the
name and address of the student. The Secretary shall notify the appropriate
school officials as provided in section 1126 of this title.
(5) The State Board may revoke, suspend, or impose conditions upon
the approval of an approved independent school, after having provided an
opportunity for a hearing, for substantial failure to comply with the minimum
course of study, for failure to demonstrate that the school has the resources
required to meet its stated objectives, for failure to comply with statutory
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 12 of 32
requirements or the Board’s rules for approved independent schools, or for
failure to report under subdivision (4) of this subsection (b). Upon that
revocation or suspension, students required to attend school who are enrolled
in that school shall become truant unless they enroll in a public school, an
approved or recognized independent school, or a home study program.
(6) This subdivision (6) applies to an independent school located in
Vermont that offers a distance learning program and that, because of its
structure, does not meet some or all the rules of the State Board for approved
independent schools. In order to be approved under this subdivision, a school
shall meet the standards adopted by rule of the State Board for approved
independent schools that can be applied to the applicant school and any other
standards or rules adopted by the State Board regarding these types of schools.
A school approved under this subdivision shall not be eligible to receive tuition
payments from public school districts under chapter 21 of this title.
(7) Approval for independent residential schools under this subsection is
also contingent upon proof of the school’s satisfactory completion of an annual
fire safety inspection by the Department of Public Safety or its designee
pursuant to 20 V.S.A. chapter 173, subchapter 2. A certificate executed by the
inspecting entity, declaring satisfactory completion of the inspection and
identifying the date by which a new inspection must occur, shall be posted at
the school in a public location. The school shall provide a copy of the
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 13 of 32
certificate to the Secretary of Education after each annual inspection. The
school shall pay the actual cost of the inspection unless waived or reduced by
the inspecting entity.
(8)(A) If an approved independent school experiences any of the
following financial reporting events during the period of its approved status,
the school shall notify the Secretary of Education within five days after its
knowledge of the event unless the failure is de minimis:
(i) the school’s failure to file its federal or State tax returns when
due, after permissible extension periods have been taken into account;
(ii) the school’s failure to meet its payroll obligations as they are
due or to pay federal or State payroll tax obligations as they are due;
(iii) the school’s failure to maintain required retirement
contributions;
(iv) the school’s use of designated funds for nondesignated
purposes;
(v) the school’s inability to fully comply with the financial terms
of its secured installment debt obligations over a period of two consecutive
months, including the school’s failure to make interest or principal payments
as they are due or to maintain any required financial ratios;
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 14 of 32
(vi) the withdrawal or conditioning of the school’s accreditation
on financial grounds by a private, State, or regional agency recognized by the
State Board for accrediting purposes; or
(vii) the school’s insolvency, as defined in 9 V.S.A. § 2286(a).
(B)(i) If the Secretary reasonably believes that an approved
independent school lacks financial capacity to meet its stated objectives during
the period of its approved status, then the Secretary shall notify the school in
writing of the reasons for this belief and permit the school a reasonable
opportunity to respond.
(ii) If the Secretary, after having provided the school a reasonable
opportunity to respond, does not find that the school has satisfactorily
responded or demonstrated its financial capacity, the Secretary may establish a
review team that, with the consent of the school, includes a member of the
Council of Independent Schools, to:
(I) conduct a school visit to assess the school’s financial
capacity;
(II) obtain from the school such financial documentation as the
review team requires to perform its assessment; and
(III) submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the
State Board.
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 15 of 32
(iii) If the State Board concludes that an approved independent
school lacks financial capacity to meet its stated objectives during the period of
its approved status, the State Board may take any action that is authorized by
this section.
(iv) In considering whether an independent school lacks financial
capacity to meet its stated objectives during the period of its approved status
and what actions the State Board should take if it makes this finding, the State
Board may consult with, and draw on the analytical resources of, the Vermont
Department of Financial Regulation.
(C) Information provided by an independent school under this
subsection that is not already in the public domain is exempt from public
inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and shall be kept
confidential. [Repealed.]
(c) Recognized independent schools. Upon filing an enrollment notice, a
recognized independent school may provide elementary or secondary
education in Vermont. The enrollment notice shall be on a form provided by
the Secretary and shall be filed with the Secretary no not earlier than three
months before the beginning of the school year for the public schools in the
town in which the applicant proposes to locate.
(1) The enrollment notice shall contain the following information and
assurances:
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 16 of 32
(A) a statement that the school will be in session an amount of time
substantially equivalent to that required for public schools;
(B) a detailed description or outline of the minimum course of study
for each grade level the school offers and how the annual assessment of each
student will be performed; and
(C) assurances that:
(i) the school will prepare and maintain attendance records for
each student enrolled or regularly attending classes;
(ii) at least once each year, the school will assess each student’s
progress, and will maintain records of that assessment, and present the result of
that assessment to each student’s parent or guardian;
(iii) the school’s educational program will include the minimum
course of study set forth in section 906 of this title;
(iv) the school will have teachers and materials sufficient to carry
out the school’s educational program; and
(v) the school will meet such State and federal laws and
regulations concerning its physical facilities and health and safety matters as
are applicable to recognized independent schools.
(2) If the Secretary has information that creates significant doubt about
whether the school would be able to meet the requirements set forth in this
subsection (c), the Secretary may call a hearing. At the hearing, the school
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 17 of 32
shall establish that it can meet the requirements for recognized independent
schools. Failure to do so shall result in a finding by the Secretary that the
school must take specified action to come into compliance within a specified
time frame or the children enrolled must attend another recognized
independent school, a public school, an approved independent school, or a
home study program, or be declared truant unless absent with legal excuse.
(3) A recognized independent school shall provide to each student’s
parent or guardian a copy of its currently filed statement of objectives and a
copy of this section. The copy shall be provided when the student enrolls or
before September 1, whichever comes later. Failure to comply with this
subsection may create a permissible inference of false advertising in violation
of 13 V.S.A. § 2005.
(4) A recognized independent school shall renew its enrollment notice
annually. An independent school shall be recognized for a period not to
exceed five years by the Secretary without need for filing an annual enrollment
notice if:
(A) it is recognized by an organization approved by the State Board
for the purpose of recognizing such school; or
(B) it is accredited by a private, state, or regional agency approved by
the State Board for accrediting purposes; provided, however, nothing in this
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 18 of 32
subdivision (4) shall be construed to prohibit the Secretary from initiating a
hearing under this subsection (c).
(5) If the Secretary has information that creates significant doubt about
whether the school, once in operation, is meeting the requirements for
recognized independent schools, the Secretary may call a hearing. At the
hearing, the school shall establish that it has met the requirements for
recognized independent schools. Failure to do so shall result in a finding by
the Secretary that:
(A) the school may not be in operation for the remainder of the
school year and that the children are truant unless absent with legal excuse or
enrolled in a public school, an independent school, another recognized
independent school, or a home study program; or
(B) the school must take specified action to come into compliance
within a specified time frame or the school will not be permitted to operate for
the remainder of the school year.
(6) Each recognized independent school shall provide to the Secretary
on October 1 of each year the names, genders, dates of birth, and addresses of
its enrolled students. Within seven days of after the termination of a student’s
enrollment, the recognized independent school shall notify the Secretary of the
name and address of the student. The Secretary shall notify the appropriate
school officials as provided in section 1126 of this title.
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 19 of 32
(7) After the filing of the enrollment notice or at a hearing, if the school
is unable to comply with any specific requirements due to deep religious
conviction shared by an organized group, the Secretary may waive such
requirements if he or she the Secretary determines that the educational
purposes of this subsection are being or will be substantially met.
(d) Council of Independent Schools. A Council of Independent Schools is
created consisting of 11 members, no fewer than three of whom shall be
representatives of recognized independent schools. The Secretary shall
appoint nine members from within the independent schools’ community. The
Secretary shall appoint two members from the public-at-large. Each member
shall serve for two years and may be reappointed for up to an additional two
terms. The Council shall adopt rules for its own operation. A chair shall be
elected by and from among the members. The duties of the Council shall
include advising the Secretary on policies and procedures with respect to
independent schools. No hearing shall be initiated under this section before the
State Board or by the Secretary until the recommendations of the Council have
been sought and received. The recommendations of the Council, including any
minority reports, shall be admissible at the hearing.
(e) Harassment, hazing, and bullying policies. The board of trustees of an
approved or a recognized independent school operating in Vermont shall adopt
harassment, hazing, and bullying prevention policies; establish procedures for
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 20 of 32
dealing with harassment, hazing, and bullying of students; and provide notice
of these. The provisions of chapter 9, subchapter 5 of this title for public
schools shall apply to this subsection, except that the board shall follow its
own procedures for adopting policy.
(f) Tuition bills. An approved independent school A school eligible for
designation under section 820 of this title that accepts students for whom the
district of residence pays tuition under chapter 21 of this title shall bill the
sending district monthly for a State-placed student and shall not bill the
sending district for any month in which the State-placed student was not
enrolled.
(g) Tuition students; assessments. An approved independent school A
school eligible for designation under section 820 of this title that accepts
students for whom the district of residence pays tuition under chapter 21 of this
title shall use the assessment or assessments required under subdivision 164(9)
of this title to measure attainment of standards for student performance of
those students. In addition, the school shall provide data related to the
assessment or assessments as required by the Secretary.
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 21 of 32
* * * Maintenance of Public Schools * * *
Sec. 6. 16 V.S.A. chapter 21 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 21. MAINTENANCE OF PUBLIC SCHOOLS
§ 820. SCHOOLS ELIGIBLE FOR DESIGNATION
(a) Under this chapter, a school district may designate a school to provide
education for resident students of the district who would spend:
(1) more than 45 minutes being transported from the resident’s home to
a public elementary school located within the district; or
(2) more than 75 minutes being transported from the resident’s home to
a public high school located within the district.
(b) A school eligible for designation shall comply with the following:
(1) General characteristics. The school shall be an independent school
recognized under section 166 of this title that meets at least three of the
following four criteria:
(A) The recognized independent school serves as a regional CTE
center as defined in section 1522 of this title.
(B) The recognized independent school was established through the
granting of a charter by the Vermont General Assembly.
(C) The recognized independent school qualified as a public school
under the definition of “public school” in effect on June 30, 1991 under
subdivision 11(a)(7) of this title.
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 22 of 32
(D) The recognized independent school is designated under section
1935 of this title as an employer of teachers within the meaning of chapter 55
of this title (State Teachers’ Retirement System of Vermont).
(2) School and class size.
(A) A recognized independent elementary school shall have a
minimum:
(i) school size of 450 students; and
(ii) average class size of 18 students.
(B) A recognized independent high school shall have a minimum:
(i) school size of 600 students; and
(ii) average class size of 25 students.
(c) This section shall not apply to therapeutic schools as defined by
subdivision 11(36) of this title.
§ 821. SCHOOL DISTRICT TO MAINTAIN PUBLIC ELEMENTARY
SCHOOLS OR PAY TUITION
(a) Each school district shall maintain one or more approved schools within
the district in which elementary education for its resident students in
kindergarten through grade six is provided unless:
(1) the electorate authorizes the school board to provide for the
elementary education of the students by paying tuition in accordance with law
to one or more public elementary schools in one or more school districts;
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 23 of 32
(2) the school district is organized to provide only high school education
for its students; or
(3) the General Assembly provides otherwise.
(b) [Repealed.]
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, without previous
authorization by the electorate, a school board in a district that operates an
elementary school may pay tuition for elementary students who reside near a
public elementary school in an adjacent district upon request of the student’s
parent or guardian, if in the board’s judgment the student’s education can be
more conveniently furnished there due to geographic considerations. Within
30 days of following the board’s decision, a parent or guardian who is
dissatisfied with the decision of the board under this subsection may request a
determination by the Secretary, who shall have authority to direct the school
board to pay all, some, or none of the student’s tuition and whose decision
shall be final.
(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the electorate of a
school district that does not maintain an elementary school may grant general
authority to the school board to pay tuition for an elementary student at an
approved independent elementary school or an independent school meeting
education quality standards pursuant to sections 823 and 828 of this chapter
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 24 of 32
upon notice given by the student’s parent or legal guardian before April 15 for
the next academic year. [Repealed.]
* * *
§ 822. SCHOOL DISTRICT TO MAINTAIN PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOLS OR
PAY TUITION
(a) Each school district shall maintain one or more approved high schools
in which high school education is provided for its resident students unless:
(1) the electorate authorizes the school board to close an existing high
school and to provide for the high school education of its students by paying
tuition to a public high school, an approved independent high school, or an
independent school meeting education quality standards, to be selected by the
parents or guardians of the student, within or outside the State; or
(2) the school district is organized to provide only elementary education
for its students.
(b) For purposes of this section, a school district that is organized to
provide kindergarten through grade 12 and maintains a program of education
for only the first eight years of compulsory school attendance shall be
obligated to pay tuition for its resident students for at least four additional
years. [Repealed.]
(c)(1) A school district may both maintain a high school and furnish high
school education by paying tuition:
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 25 of 32
(A) to a public school as in the judgment of the school board may
best serve the interests of the students; or
(B) to an approved independent school or an independent school
meeting education quality standards if the school board judges that a student
has unique educational needs that cannot be served within the district or at a
nearby public school.
(2) The judgment of the board shall be final in regard to the institution
the students may attend at public cost. [Repealed.]
* * *
§ 823. ELEMENTARY TUITION
(a) Tuition for elementary students shall be paid by the district in which the
student is a resident. The district shall pay the full tuition charged its students
attending a public designated elementary school. If a payment made to a
public designated elementary school is three percent more or less than the
calculated net cost per elementary pupil in the receiving school district for the
year of attendance, the district shall be reimbursed, credited, or refunded
pursuant to section 836 of this title. Notwithstanding the provisions of this
subsection or of subsection 825(b) of this title, the boards or boards of trustees
of both the receiving and sending districts or schools may enter into tuition
agreements with terms differing from the provisions of those subsections,
provided that the receiving district or school must offer identical terms to all
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 26 of 32
sending districts, and further provided that the statutory provisions apply to
any sending district that declines the offered terms.
(b) Unless the electorate of a school district authorizes payment of a higher
amount at an annual or special meeting warned for the purpose, the tuition paid
to an approved independent elementary school or an independent school
meeting education quality standards shall not exceed the least of:
(1) the average announced tuition of Vermont union elementary schools
for the year of attendance;
(2) the tuition charged by the approved independent school for the year
of attendance; or
(3) the average per-pupil tuition the district pays for its other resident
elementary students in the year in which the student is enrolled in the approved
independent school. [Repealed.]
§ 824. HIGH SCHOOL TUITION
(a) Tuition for high school students shall be paid by the school district in
which the student is a resident.
(b) Except as otherwise provided for technical students, the district shall
pay the full tuition charged its students attending a public designated high
school in Vermont or an adjoining state or a public or approved independent
school in Vermont functioning as an approved area career technical center, or
an independent school meeting education quality standards; provided:
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 27 of 32
(1) If a payment made to a public designated high school or an
independent school meeting education quality standards is three percent more
or less than the calculated net cost per secondary pupil in the receiving school
district or independent school for the year of attendance then the district or
school shall be reimbursed, credited, or refunded pursuant to section 836 of
this title.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection or of subsection
825(b) of this title, the board or board of trustees of the receiving public
designated school district, or public or approved independent school
functioning as an area career technical center, or independent school meeting
education quality standards may enter into tuition agreements with the boards
of sending districts that have terms differing from the provisions of those
subsections, provided that the receiving district or school must offer identical
terms to all sending districts, and further provided that the statutory provisions
apply to any sending district that declines the offered terms.
(c) The district shall pay an amount not to exceed the average announced
tuition of Vermont union high schools for the year of attendance for its
students enrolled in an approved independent school not functioning as a
Vermont area career technical center, or any higher amount approved by the
electorate at an annual or special meeting warned for that purpose. [Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 28 of 32
§ 826. NOTICE OF TUITION RATES; SPECIAL EDUCATION CHARGES
(a) A school board, or the board of trustees of an independent school
meeting education quality standards, a school eligible for designation under
section 820 of this title that proposes to increase tuition charges shall notify the
school board of the school district from which its nonresident students come,
and the Secretary, of the proposed increase on or before January 15 in any
year; such increases shall not become effective without the notice and not until
the following school year.
(b) A school board or the board of trustees of an independent school
meeting education quality standards may establish a separate tuition for one or
more special education programs. No such tuition shall be established unless
the State Board has by rule defined the program as of a type that may be
funded by a separate tuition. Any such tuition shall be announced in
accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section. The amount
of tuition shall reflect the net cost per pupil in the program. The announcement
of tuition shall describe the special education services included or excluded
from coverage. Tuition for part-time students shall be reduced proportionally.
* * *
§ 827. DESIGNATION OF A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL OR AN
APPROVED INDEPENDENT HIGH SCHOOL AS THE PUBLIC
HIGH SCHOOL OF A SCHOOL DISTRICT
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 29 of 32
(a) A school district not maintaining an approved public high school may
vote on such terms or conditions as it deems appropriate, to designate three or
fewer approved independent or public high schools as the public high school or
schools of the district eligible for designation under section 820 of this title to
provide education for the district’s resident students who would spend:
(1) more than 45 minutes being transported from the resident’s home to
a public elementary school located within the district; or
(2) more than 75 minutes being transported from the resident’s home to
a public high school located within the district.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the board of trustees or
the school board of a designated school votes to accept this designation, the
school shall be regarded as a public school for tuition purposes under
subsection 824(b) tuition shall be paid in accordance with sections 823 and 824
of this title, and the sending school district shall pay tuition only to that school,
and to any other school designated under this section, until such time as the
sending school district or the designated school votes to rescind the
designation.
(c) A parent or legal guardian who is dissatisfied with the instruction
provided at a designated school or who cannot obtain for his or her child the
kind of course or instruction desired there, or whose child can be better
accommodated in an approved independent or public high school nearer his or
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 30 of 32
her home during the next academic year, may request on or before April 15
that the school board pay tuition to another approved independent or public
high school selected by the parent or guardian. [Repealed.]
(d) The school board may pay tuition to another approved high school as
requested by the parent or legal guardian if in its judgment that will best serve
the interests of the student. Its decision shall be final in regard to the
institution the student may attend. If the board approves the parent’s request,
the board shall pay tuition for the student in an amount not to exceed the least
of:
(1) The statewide average announced tuition of Vermont union high
schools.
(2) The per-pupil tuition the district pays to the designated school in the
year in which the student is enrolled in the nondesignated school. If the district
has designated more than one school pursuant to this section, then it shall be
the lowest per-pupil tuition paid to a designated school.
(3) The tuition charged by the approved nondesignated school in the
year in which the student is enrolled. [Repealed.]
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary:
(1) the school districts of Pawlet, Rupert, and Wells may designate a
public high school located in New York as the public high school of the district
pursuant to the provisions of this section;
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 31 of 32
(2) unless otherwise directed by an affirmative vote of the school
district, when the Wells Board approves parental requests to pay tuition to a
nondesignated approved independent or public school, the Board shall pay
tuition in an amount not to exceed the base education amount as determined
under section 4011 of this title for the fiscal year in which tuition is being paid;
and
(3) unless otherwise directed by an affirmative vote of the school
district, when the Strafford Board approves a parental request to pay tuition to
a nondesignated approved independent or public school, the Board shall pay
tuition to the nondesignated school pursuant to section 824 of this title for the
year in which the student is enrolled; provided, however, that it shall not pay
tuition in an amount that exceeds the tuition paid to the designated school for
the same academic year. [Repealed.]
§ 828. TUITION TO APPROVED SCHOOLS; AGE; APPEAL
A school district shall not pay the tuition of a student except to a public
school, an approved independent school, an independent school meeting
education quality standards a school eligible for designation under section 820
of this title, a tutorial program approved by the State Board, a therapeutic
school, or an approved education program, or an independent school in another
state or country approved under the laws of that state or country, that complies
with the reporting requirement under subsection 4010(c) of this title, nor shall
VT LEG #379058 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.122
2025 Page 32 of 32
payment of tuition on behalf of a person be denied on account of age. Unless
otherwise provided, a person who is aggrieved by a decision of a school board
relating to eligibility for tuition payments, the amount of tuition payable, or the
school the person may attend, may appeal to the State Board and its decision
shall be final.
* * *
* * * Technical and Conforming Amendments * * *
Sec. 7. LEGISLATIVE COUNSEL; PREPARATION OF A DRAFT BILL
On or before January 15, 2026, the Office of Legislative Counsel shall
prepare and submit a draft bill to the House and Senate Committees on
Education that makes statutory amendments of a technical nature and identifies
all statutory sections that the General Assembly shall amend substantively to
effect the intent of the act.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379058 v.3